Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB738.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 64 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Notwithstanding any provision of KRS Chapter 18A, KRS 64.640, or other law to the
contrary, constitutional officers specified in Section 93 of the Constitution of Kentucky
may:
(1) Employ persons exempt from the classified service as those officers deem
necessary or advisable for making and carrying out policy; and
(2) Increase by administrative order the salary of any classified employee with status
up to the midpoint of the grade for the employee's classification.
Page 1 of 1
BR146900.100 - 1469 - XXXX 3/11/2025 5:16 PM Jacketed